Washington statutes.
RCW 19.373.050

Data security practices.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, beginning March 31, 2024, a regulated entity and a small business shall:

(a) Restrict access to consumer health data by the employees, processors, and contractors of such regulated entity or small business to only those employees, processors, and contractors for which access is necessary to further the purposes for which the consumer provided consent or where necessary to provide a product or service that the consumer to whom such consumer health data relates has requested from such regulated entity or small business; and

(b) Establish, implement, and maintain administrative, technical, and physical data security practices that, at a minimum, satisfy reasonable standard of care within the regulated entity's or the small business's industry to protect the confidentiality, integrity, and accessibility of consumer health data appropriate to the volume and nature of the consumer health data at issue.

(2) A small business must comply with this section beginning June 30, 2024.

[ 2023 c 191 s 7.]